Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.141

County commissioners to provide temporary quarters.

Until proper buildings are erected at a place fixed upon for the seat of justice in any county, it shall be the duty of the county commissioners to provide some suitable place for holding the courts of such county.

[Code 1881 s 2688; 1854 p 423 s 23; RRS s 4035.]